src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verbOdd_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - gahtsajit : # BEGATJIT
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Inf: gahtsajit 
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Sup: gahtsajittjat
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ger: gahtsajattijn
    gahtsajit+V+IV+PrfPrc: gahtsajam
    gahtsajit+V+IV+PrsPrc: gahtsajiddje
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [gahtsajime, gahtsajimen]
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: gahtsajimes
    gahtsajit+V+IV+VAbess: [gahtsajik, gahtsajak]
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gahtsajav
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gahtsaja
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gahtsaj
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gahtsajin 
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: gahtsajihppe
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gahtsajibá
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gahtsaji
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gahtsajiv
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gahtsaji
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gahtsajij
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gahtsajijma 
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gahtsajijda
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gahtsajin
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gahtsaja
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: gahtsajip
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: gahtsajihtit
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Sh: gahtsajit
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: gahtsajisá
    gahtsajit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: gahtsajuhtut
    gahtsajit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: gahtsajusá
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: gahtsajittjap
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: gahtsajittjabihtit
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: gahtsajittji
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [gahtsajuvvá]
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: gahtsajalulu
    gahtsajit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: gahtsajalulujma

  Verb - gerjudit : # BALÁDIT_IV
    gerjudit+V+IV+Inf: gerjudit 
    gerjudit+V+IV+Sup: gerjudittjat
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ger: gerjudattijn
    gerjudit+V+IV+PrfPrc: gerjudam
    gerjudit+V+IV+PrsPrc: gerjudiddje
    gerjudit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [gerjudime, gerjudimen]
    gerjudit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: gerjudimes
    gerjudit+V+IV+VAbess: [gerjudik, gerjudak]
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gerjudav
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gerjuda
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: gerjut
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: gerjudin 
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: gerjudihppe
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: gerjudibá
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gerjudi
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gerjudiv
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gerjudi
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gerjudij
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gerjudijma 
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gerjudijda
    gerjudit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: gerjudin
    gerjudit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: gerjuda
    gerjudit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: gerjudip
    gerjudit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: gerjudihtit
    gerjudit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: gerjudisá
    gerjudit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: gerjuduhtut
    gerjudit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: gerjudusá
    gerjudit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: gerjudittjap
    gerjudit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: gerjudittjabihtit
    gerjudit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: gerjudittji
    gerjudit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [gerjuduvvá]
    gerjudit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: gerjudalulu
    gerjudit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: gerjudalulujma

  Verb - juhtsalit : # SUOGNALIT_IV
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Inf: juhtsalit 
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Sup: juhtsalittjat
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ger: juhtsalattijn
    juhtsalit+V+IV+PrfPrc: juhtsalam
    juhtsalit+V+IV+PrsPrc: juhtsaliddje
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [juhtsalime, juhtsalimen]
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: juhtsalimes
    juhtsalit+V+IV+VAbess: [juhtsalik, juhtsalak]
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juhtsalav
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: juhtsala
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juhtsal
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: juhtsalin 
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: juhtsalihppe
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: juhtsalibá
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juhtsali
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juhtsaliv
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juhtsali
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juhtsalij
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: juhtsalijma 
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: juhtsalijda
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juhtsalin
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: juhtsala
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: juhtsalip
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: juhtsalihtit
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: juhtsalisá
    juhtsalit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: juhtsaluhtut
    juhtsalit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: juhtsalusá
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: juhtsalittjap
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: juhtsalittjabihtit
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: juhtsalittji
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [juhtsaluvvá]
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: juhtsalalulu
    juhtsalit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: juhtsalalulujma
